Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-411 Loans to other credit unions. A
credit union may make loans to other credit unions, central credit unions,
corporate credit unions or a central liquidity facility established under
federal or state law; provided that the loans shall be approved by the board of
directors and that the aggregate of all loans to such credit unions and a
central liquidity facility shall not exceed twenty-five per cent of the lending
credit union's capital. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next